Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-117.02
Military families, defined.

Military families means active duty service members in the armed services of the United States, military spouses, honorably discharged veterans of the armed services of the United States, spouses of such honorably discharged veterans, and unremarried surviving spouses of deceased service members of the armed services of the United States.

Laws 2019, LB112, § 4.